District of Columbia statutes.
47-1309

Real property tax assignment; sale and transfers — Advertising expenses.

The expenses of advertising the notice of sale and delinquent tax list for real property taxes, water charges, sanitary sewer service charges, and special assessments in arrears together with penalties and costs, shall be reimbursed to the District by a charge to be fixed annually by the Mayor and assessed against each lot or piece of property advertised. The amounts so received shall be deposited to such fund of the District as the Mayor shall from time to time determine.

Feb. 28, 1898, 30 Stat. 252, ch. 32, § 7
July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 635, ch. 1358, § 1(7)
May 21, 1928, 45 Stat. 650, ch. 659
Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 508, Pub. L. 93-140, § 25(b)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1973 Ed., § 47-1008.
1981 Ed., § 47-1309.